Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.155

Collection and transportation of recyclable materials by recycling companies or nonprofit entities—Reuse or reclamation—Application of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a recycling company or nonprofit entity from collecting and transporting recyclable materials from a buy-back center, drop-box, or from a commercial or industrial generator of recyclable materials, or upon agreement with a solid waste collection company.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting a commercial or industrial generator of commercial recyclable materials from selling, conveying, or arranging for transportation of such material to a recycler for reuse or reclamation.

[ 1989 c 431 s 35.]

NOTES: